Massachusetts, session 194th, S3236.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, 
may convey, amend, assign or otherwise transfer to Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC a 50 foot 
wide permanent right-of-way and easement for: (i) the purpose of constructing, maintaining and 
operating a pipeline, together with any and all necessary or useful appurtenances thereto; (ii) the 
transmission of natural gas and all by-products thereof; and (iii) permanent access roads 
necessary to access such facilities. The easements may be granted on the properties described in 
subsection (b) currently held for fish and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and 
associated public recreation in accordance with Article XCVII of the Amendments to the 
Constitution of the commonwealth. The grant of the easement shall be on such terms and 

of 5 12 conditions as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation 
with the commissioner of fish and game, may determine. 
(b) The easements described in subsection (a) may be granted on parcels more 
particularly described as the following: located within joint base cape cod, shown on the town of 
Bourne assessor’s map as tax parcel number 44.0_50_0 and tax parcel number 17.0_3_0. The 
easements and permanent access roads are approximately 5.272 acres, as more particularly 
shown as “Proposed New Perm. Easement” and “Perm. Access Rd” on Sheets 1-5, and 17 of 17 
of the plans entitled, “Area of Permanent Easement & Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of 
Massachusetts,” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-023 and G-32-MA-BA-001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen 
Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025; and shown as “Proposed New Perm. Easement” and 
“Perm. Access Rd” on Sheets 2, 3, 6, and 7 of 7 of the plans entitled, “Area of Permanent 
Easement & Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-
025 and G-32-MA-BA-001.001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 
2025. 
SECTION 2. In consideration for the conveyance authorized in section 1, and to ensure 
no net loss of land subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
commonwealth, Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall convey to the commonwealth an 
approximately 7.00 acre parcel of land shown as, “Proposed Conveyance to the Department of 
Fish and Game” on a plan entitled “Plan of Land Stop & Shop Supermarket Company, LLC 
Bourne, MA” dated May 20, 2026, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc., for the purposes 
of fish and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and associated public recreation in 
accordance with said Article 97. 

of 5 34  SECTION 3. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital 
asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the commissioner of fish and game, 
may convey, amend, assign or otherwise transfer to Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC a 50 foot 
wide permanent right-of-way and easement for: (i) the purpose of constructing, maintaining and 
operating a pipeline, together with any and all necessary or useful appurtenances thereto; (ii) the 
transmission of natural gas and all by-products thereof; and (iii) permanent access roads 
necessary to access such facilities and temporary workspaces necessary for the construction of 
said facilities. The easements may be granted on the properties described in subsection (b) 
currently held for fish and wildlife conservation, natural habitat protection and associated public 
recreation in accordance with Article XCVII of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
commonwealth. The grant of the easement shall be on such terms and conditions as the 
commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the 
commissioner of fish and game, may determine. 
(b) The easements described in subsection (a) may be granted on parcels more 
particularly described and located within joint base cape cod: (i) shown on the town of Bourne 
assessor’s map as tax parcel number 44.0_50_0, and Tax Parcel Number 17.0_3_0. The 
easements and permanent access roads are particularly shown as, “Proposed New Perm. 
Easement” and “Perm. Access Rd” on the plans entitled, “Area of Permanent Easement & 
Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tracts G-31-MA-BA-023 and G-32-
MA-BA-001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025; and shown 
as “Proposed New Perm. Easement” and “Perm. Access Rd” on the plans entitled, “Area of 
Permanent Easement & Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tracts G-31-

of 5 57 MA-BA-025 and G-32-MA-BA-001.001, prepared by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated 
August 1, 2025; and (ii) shown on the town of Bourne assessor’s map as tax parcel number 
10.0_7_0, more particularly shown on the plan entitled, “Area of Permanent Easement & 
Temporary Workspace, Commonwealth of Massachusetts,” Tract G-31-MA-BA-007, prepared 
by Vanasse Hangen Brustlin, Inc. and dated August 1, 2025. 
SECTION 4. (a) The value of the easements described in sections 1 and 3 and the value 
of the property interest to be conveyed to the commonwealth pursuant to section 2 shall be 
determined by an independent appraisal prepared in accordance with the usual and customary 
professional appraisal practice by a qualified appraiser commissioned by the commissioner of 
capital asset management and maintenance. The commissioner may, in consultation with the 
commissioner of fish and game, accept an appraisal of said easements and property interest 
conducted prior to the effective date of this act. The commissioner of capital asset management 
and maintenance shall submit the appraisal to the inspector general for his review and comment. 
The inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal, and the review shall include an 
examination of the methodology used for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a 
report of his review and file the report with the commissioner for submission by the 
commissioner to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee 
on state administration and regulatory oversight. The commissioner shall submit copies of the 
appraisals, and the inspector general’s report to the house and senate committees on ways and 
means and the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight before the 
execution of the conveyances. 
(b) Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall compensate the commonwealth in an amount 
greater than, or equal to, the full and fair market value, or the value in use of the easements 

of 5 80 authorized in sections 1 and 3, whichever is greater, as determined by the independent appraisals. 
The commonwealth shall not be obligated to pay any consideration to Algonquin Gas 
Transmission, LLC if the appraised value of any parcels or interests conveyed to the 
commonwealth exceeds the value of the easements authorized in section 1 and 3. All money paid 
to the commonwealth by Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC as a result of the conveyance of the 
easements authorized by this act shall be deposited in the Biodiversity Fund established by 
section 35D ½ of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to be used for future land acquisition by the 
department of fish and game. 
(c) If the independent appraisal shows that the fair market value or value in use, 
whichever is greater, of the interests described in section 1 are not equal to or greater than the 
fair market value or value in use, whichever is greater, of the property interest to be conveyed to 
the commonwealth pursuant to section 2, then Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC shall 
compensate the commonwealth in an amount equal to or greater than this difference in monetary 
value. All money paid to the commonwealth by Algonquin Gas Transmission, LLC as a result of 
the conveyance of the easements authorized by this act shall be deposited in the Biodiversity 
Fund established by section 35D ½ of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to be used for future land 
acquisition by the department of fish and game. 
SECTION 5. Algonquin Gas Transmission LLC shall be responsible for all costs 
associated with engineering, surveys, appraisals, document preparation and other expenses 
deemed necessary by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance to effect 
100 the conveyances authorized by this act.